Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 11
GAMING DEVICES

44-30-1101. Exemption from federal law.

Pursuant to section 2 of an act of congress of the United States entitled "An Act to prohibit transportation of gambling devices in interstate and foreign commerce", approved January 2, 1951, designated 15 U.S.C. secs. 1171 to 1177, inclusive, and in effect January 1, 1989, the state of Colorado acting by and through its elected and qualified members of its general assembly, does hereby, and in accordance with and in compliance with the provisions of section 2 of the act of congress, declare and proclaim that it is exempt from the provisions of section 2 of that act of congress of the United States, as regards gaming devices operated and used within the cities of Central, Black Hawk, and Cripple Creek, Colorado.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 221, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-1101 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-1102. Shipments of devices and machines deemed legal.

All shipments of gaming devices, including slot machines, into this state, the registering, recording, and labeling of which has been duly made by the manufacturer or dealer thereof in accordance with sections 3 and 4 of an act of congress of the United States entitled "An Act to prohibit transportation of gambling devices in interstate and foreign commerce", approved January 2, 1951, designated as 15 U.S.C. secs. 1171 to 1177, inclusive, and in effect on January 1, 1989, shall be deemed legal shipments thereof, for use only within the cities of Central, Black Hawk, and Cripple Creek, Colorado.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 222, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-1102 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-1103. Ownership or possession of slot machines - rules.

Notwithstanding any other laws of this state to the contrary, if a licensed slot machine manufacturer, slot machine distributor, operator, retailer, or a retail gaming license applicant complies with all of the provisions of this article 30 and the rules promulgated under this article 30, he or she may legally own, possess, or own and possess slot machines in this state; except that nothing in this section authorizes the use of slot machines for any purpose other than the purposes specifically authorized in this article 30 and the rules promulgated under this article 30. The commission shall promulgate rules concerning the conditions under which the division may authorize a retail gaming license applicant to own, possess, or own and possess slot machines in this state before obtaining a retail gaming license.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 222, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-1103 as it existed prior to 2018.